Washington statutes.
RCW 42.20.080

Other violations by officers.

Every officer or other person mentioned in RCW 42.20.070, who shall willfully disobey any provision of law regulating his or her official conduct in cases other than those specified in said section, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2012 c 117 s 116; 1909 c 249 s 318; RRS s 2570.]